Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 4. NAVIGATION

SUBTITLE A. WATERWAYS AND PORTS

CHAPTER 60. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 60.001. THROWING BALLAST. (a) A master or officer in charge of a vessel commits an offense if any part of the ballast of the vessel is thrown from the vessel into the sea within six miles of a bar or harbor in this state.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $100 or more than $200.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 19.001(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.